Missouri, session 2026, HB2979.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 191, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 191.260, to read as follows:
191.260. 1. The provisions of this section shall be known and may be cited as the
"Missouri Rural Doctors Act".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Covenant not to compete", an agreement or part of a contract of
employment in which the employee agrees to:
(a) Refrain from competition with an employer for a specific period of time upon
termination or conclusion of the employment;
(b) Refrain from competition with an employer within a particular geographic
area upon termination or conclusion of the employment; or
(c) Refrain from competition with an employer for a specific period of time and
within a particular geographic area upon termination or conclusion of the employment;
(2) "Nonprofit employer", an entity that employs one or more physicians and
that is owned or operated by a nonprofit corporation that is exempt from federal income
tax under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(3) "Physician", a physician licensed under chapter 334;
(4) "Research university hospital", a hospital, as defined in section 197.020,
owned or operated by a research university.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2979 2
3. A covenant not to compete between a physician and a nonprofit employer
shall be valid and enforceable only if:
(1) The physician is providing health care services in a clinical setting;
(2) The covenant not to compete does not restrict the physician's competitive
activities for a period of more than three hundred sixty-five days; and
(3) The covenant not to compete does not restrict the physician's competitive
activities in a geographic area of more than five miles from the address of the office or
facility in which the physician provides health care services in a clinical setting.
4. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any covenant not to compete
between a physician and a research university hospital.
✔